Missouri, session 2026, HB2342.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 1.342, to read as follows:
1.342. 1. As used in this section, "accessible standards" means the federal 2010
2 ADA Standards for Accessible Design and relevant regulations issued by the United
3 States Department of Justice or successor standards.
4 2. Each playground area and playground surface constructed by the state or any
5 political subdivision thereof on or after the effective date of this section shall comply
6 with accessible standards.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.